Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Disposition of Surplus State Property.

Sec. 44.68.110.
Disposition of obsolete or surplus state property.

The Department of Administration shall take possession of obsolete or surplus property of the state, including recyclable property, for which there is no immediate or prospective use, except abandoned or obsolete school buildings and other school property. It shall also take possession of property, including recyclable property, remaining in the control of a commission or board of the state government after the commission or board stops functioning. The Department of Administration shall sell, lease, license, or dispose of the property on the terms it considers for the best interests of the state in conformance with regulations adopted under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code). In this section, “recyclable property” means property that cannot be used for its intended purpose in its present form, but that can be used to create new property.

Before a state agency transfers obsolete or surplus property to the Department of Administration for sale, lease, licensing, or other disposition under (a) of this section, the state agency shall reconfigure or erase all functions, including electronic functions, of the property as necessary to prevent the property from producing indicators that the property, or a product generated by the property, is property of the state or is generated by a state agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 1953; am § 49 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 175 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.71.010. Renumbered in 1989.

Administrative Code. —

For sale of surplus property, see 2 AAC 20.

Collateral references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d, Administrative Law, § 48 et seq.

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories and Dependencies, §§ 67-70.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 259-264.